Hawaii statutes.
[§167-4] Interested members of the board or
employees. No member of the board of agriculture or employees of the board
shall acquire any interest, direct or indirect, in any water facility or
project or in any property, included or planned to be included in any facility
or project, nor shall any member of the board or employee of the board have any
interest, direct or indirect, in any contract or proposed contract, for
materials or services to be furnished or used in connection with any water
facility or project. If any member of the board or employee of the board owns
or controls an interest, direct or indirect, in any property included or
planned to be included in any water facility or project, the member of the
board or employee of the board shall immediately disclose the same in writing
to the board and the disclosure shall be entered upon the minutes of the
board. The member of the board or employee shall be immediately disqualified
from taking any part of the action of the board relative to the water facility
or project. Failure to so disclose the interest shall constitute misconduct in
office. [L 1987, c 306, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next